California statutes. Public Resources Code
The commission, unless specifically otherwise provided, shall have the primary responsibility for the implementation of the provisions of this division and is designated as the state coastal zone planning and management agency for any and all purposes, and may exercise any and all powers set forth in the Federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C. 1451, et seq.) or any amendment thereto or any other federal act heretofore or hereafter enacted that relates to the planning or management of the coastal zone.

In addition to any other authority, the commission may, except for a facility defined in Section 25110, grant or issue any certificate or statement required pursuant to any such federal law that an activity of any person, including any local, state, or federal agency, is in conformity with the provisions of this division. With respect to any project outside the coastal zone that may have a substantial effect on the resources within the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, established pursuant to Title 7.2 (commencing with Section 66600) of the Government Code, and for which any certification is required pursuant to the Federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C. 1451, et seq.), such certification shall be issued by the Bay Conservation and Development Commission; provided however, the commission may review and submit comments for any such project which affects resources within the coastal zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1331.)
-------------------------------------------

30331.

The commission is designated the successor in interest to all remaining obligations, powers, duties, responsibilities, benefits, and interests of any sort of the California Coastal Zone Conservation Commission and of the six regional coastal zone conservation commissions established by the California Coastal Zone Conservation Act of 1972 (commencing with Section 27000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30333.

(a) Except as provided in Section 18930 of the Health and Safety Code, the commission may adopt or amend, by vote of a majority of the appointed membership of the commission, rules and regulations to carry out the purposes and provisions of this division, and to govern procedures of the commission.

(b) Except as provided in Section 18930 of the Health and Safety Code and paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 30620, these rules and regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. These rules and regulations shall be consistent with this division and other
 applicable law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 472, Sec. 6.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

30333.1.

The commission shall periodically review its regulations and procedures and determine what revisions, if any, are necessary and appropriate to simplify and expedite the review of any matter that is before the commission for action pursuant to this division. The commission shall implement, within 60 days of the review, any revisions it determines to be appropriate, so that its regulations and procedures may continue to be as simple and expeditious as practicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 294, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30333.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law and except as provided in the State Building Standards Law, Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18900) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, the commission shall not adopt nor publish a building standard, as defined in Section 18909 of the Health and Safety Code, unless the provisions of Sections 18930, 18933, 18938, 18940, 18943, 18944, and 18945 of the Health and Safety Code are expressly excepted in the statute under which the authority to adopt rules, regulations, or orders is delegated. A building standard adopted in violation of this section shall have no force or effect. A building standard expressly required by a provision of federal law, specifically requiring that building standard, shall be adopted and published in the State Building Standards Code within the time required by federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 294, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30334.

The commission may do the following:

(a) Contract for any private professional or governmental services, if the work or services cannot be satisfactorily performed by its employees. 

(b) Sue and be sued. The Attorney General shall represent the commission in any litigation or proceeding before any court, board, or agency of the state or federal government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

30334.5.

In addition to the authority granted by Section 30334, the commission may apply for and accept grants, appropriations, and contributions in any form.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1331.)
-------------------------------------------

30335.

The commission shall appoint an executive director who shall be exempt from civil service and shall serve at the pleasure of the commission. The commission shall prescribe the duties and salaries of the executive director, and, consistent with applicable civil service laws, shall appoint and discharge any officer, house staff counsel, or employee of the commission as it deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 12.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30335.1.

The commission shall provide for appropriate employees on the staff of the commission to assist applicants and other interested parties in connection with matters which are before the commission for action. The assistance rendered by those employees shall be limited to matters of procedure and shall not extend to advice on substantive issues arising out of the provisions of this division, such as advice on the manner in which a proposed development might be made consistent with the policies specified in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

30335.5.

(a) The commission shall, if it determines that it has sufficient resources, establish one or more scientific panels to review technical documents and reports and to give advice and make recommendations to the commission before making decisions requiring scientific expertise and analysis not available to the commission through its staff resources. It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission base any such technical decisions on scientific expertise and advice. The panel or panels may be composed of, but not limited to, persons with expertise and training in marine biology, fisheries, geology, coastal geomorphology, coastal erosion, geographic information systems, water quality, hydrology, ocean and coastal engineering, economics, and social sciences.

(b) Members of a scientific panel, while performing duties required by this division or by the commission, shall be entitled to the same rights and immunities granted public employees by Article 3 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code. Those rights and immunities shall attach to the member as of the date of appointment of the person to the panel.

(c) The commission is encouraged to seek funding from any appropriate public or private source, and may apply for and expend any grant or endowment funds, for the purposes of this section. Any funding made available to the commission for these purposes shall be reported to the fiscal committee of each house of the Legislature at the time the commission’s budget is being formally reviewed.

(d) The commission is
 encouraged to use innovative techniques to increase effective communication between the commission and the scientific community, including the use of existing grant programs and volunteers, in order to improve and strengthen the technical basis of its planning and regulatory decisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 88, Sec. 1.   (AB 1881)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

30336.

The commission shall, to the maximum extent feasible, assist local governments in exercising the planning and regulatory powers and responsibilities provided for by this division where the local government elects to exercise those powers and responsibilities and requests assistance from the commission, and shall cooperate with and assist other public agencies in carrying out this division. Similarly, every public agency, including regional and state agencies and local governments, shall cooperate with the commission and shall, to the extent their resources permit, provide any advice, assistance, or information the commission may require to perform its duties and to more effectively exercise its authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

30337.

The commission shall, where feasible, and in cooperation with the affected agency, establish a joint development permit application system and public hearing procedures with permit issuing agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30338.

By May 1, 1977, the commission, after full consultation with the State Water Resources Control Board, shall adopt regulations for the timing of its review of proposed treatment works pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 30412.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30339.

The commission shall:

(a) Ensure full and adequate participation by all interested groups and the public at large in the commission’s work program. 

(b) Ensure that timely and complete notice of commission meetings and public hearings is disseminated to all interested groups and the public at large. 

(c) Advise all interested groups and the public at large as to effective ways of participating in commission proceedings. 

(d) Recommend to any local government preparing or implementing a local coastal program and to any state agency that is carrying out duties or responsibilities pursuant to this division, additional measures to assure open consideration and more effective public participation in its programs or activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

30340.

The commission shall manage and budget any funds that may be appropriated, allocated, granted, or in any other way made available to the commission for expenditure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 133.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

30340.5.

(a) It is the policy of the state that no less than 50 percent of funds received by the state from the federal government pursuant to the Federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1451 et seq.) shall be used for the preparation, review, approval, certification, and implementation of local coastal programs.

(b) A local government subject to this division may claim reimbursement of costs incurred as a direct result of the operation of or any requirement promulgated pursuant to this division. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a claim for reimbursement of mandated costs directly attributable to the operation of this division shall only be submitted, reviewed, and approved in the manner set forth in
 this section.

(c) A claim pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the executive director of the commission no later than September 30. The executive director shall review the claim in accordance with this section and shall submit the claim to the Controller within 60 days after receipt of a claim but in no event later than November 30.

(d) A claim submitted pursuant to this section shall be filed on forms approved and prepared by the commission in consultation with the Controller. The forms shall specify the information needed to enable the executive director of the commission and the Controller to make the determinations required by subdivision (e). The forms shall clearly set forth information requirements for the evaluation of the following categories of costs:

(1) Costs for work relating to the
 preparation, review, and approval of a local coastal program or a portion of a program.

(2) Costs for work that is not covered by paragraph (1).

The claim forms required by this section shall provide for claims of actual costs incurred during the fiscal year preceding submittal and for the costs the claimant local government estimates will be incurred during the then-current fiscal year.

(e) The executive director shall review and evaluate each claim submitted pursuant to this section and shall determine whether:

(1) The costs claimed are not paid for or reimbursed from any other source of state or federal funding.

(2) The costs are for work that is the direct result of and is mandated by the operation of this
 division or by the commission or whether the work is optional.

(3) With respect to costs specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the work done or to be done is reasonable and necessary for the preparation and approval of a local coastal program pursuant to a local coastal program work program approved by the commission, or for work that is not part of an approved work program if the work can be shown to be necessary for the completion of a certifiable local coastal program or if new information or other circumstances cause the commission to require that the work be carried out.

(f) The executive director of the commission shall submit to the Controller, on behalf of each claimant local government, all claims submitted pursuant to this section together with
 the executive director’s recommendation whether the Controller should allow or deny, in whole or in part, the claim. The executive director’s recommendation shall be based on their
 determinations made pursuant to subdivision (e). If the executive director fails to make a recommendation by the time a claim is required to be submitted to the Controller as provided in subdivision (c), the executive director is deemed to have recommended approval of the claim.

(g) Section 17561 of the Government Code shall apply to a claim filed pursuant to this section. However, where a conflict between Section 17561 of the Government Code and this section occurs, the conflict shall be resolved in a manner that best carries out the purposes of this section. The Controller shall apply the criteria of subdivision (e) in determining whether to allow or deny, in whole or in part, a claim and shall consider the recommendations of the executive director of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 13.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30340.6.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that all costs mandated by the operation of this division be paid either with state or federal funds or both. The Legislature hereby declares that Section 30340.5 is designed to ensure that local governments are paid for legitimate claims for costs mandated by this division or the commission, costs for work that is not optional, and costs that are not otherwise reimbursed.

(b) In the event a claimed mandated cost has been approved by the Controller pursuant to Section 30340.5 and the Legislature fails to appropriate the funds to pay those
 claims by special legislation or in the annual state budget for the fiscal year following approval of the claims by the Controller,
 any dates specified in this division or by order of the commission for the submission of a local coastal program or any portion of a local coastal program or for the performance of any task or duty by a claimant local government whose approved claim has not been paid shall, at the request of the claimant local government, be postponed by the number of years elapsing between the specified date and the year in
 which the funds to pay the approved claim are provided.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to any local government if the Legislature determines that the local government’s claim should not be paid because the claim is not of the type intended to be subject to reimbursement pursuant to Section
 30340.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 102, Sec. 5.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30341.

The commission may prepare and adopt any additional plans and maps and undertake any studies it determines to be necessary and appropriate to better accomplish the purposes, goals, and policies of this division; provided, however, that the plans and maps shall only be adopted after public hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

30344.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the coastal zone is one of its most precious natural resources, rich in diversity of living and nonliving resources and in the wide range of opportunities it provides for the use and conservation by the people of this state and nation. The Legislature further finds that, in order to promote the wise use of coastal resources for, among other things, recreation, habitat conservation, educational, and scientific study, the production of food and fiber, residential purposes, and economic growth, it is necessary to provide the public with an informative and educational guide to coastal resources.

(b) The commission shall, not later than July 1, 1984, prepare a guide to coastal resources. The guide shall include, but not be limited to, the following components:

(1) An inventory of the natural resources which are of environmental, social, economic, and educational importance to the public. The inventory shall include a description of the resources, their location, and their significance to the people and the natural environment.

(2) An inventory of manmade resources of cultural, historic, economic, and educational importance to the public. The inventory shall focus on those resources which, by virtue of their location in or near the coastal zone, take on a special character or which, because of their nature, require a coastal location. The inventory shall include a description of the resource and any historic, educational, and technical notes of interest.

(3) A listing of public and private entities having responsibility for the planning, management, use, and restoration of the coastal resources and how interested persons can contact those entities for further information about their projects and programs.

The purpose of this guide shall be to contribute to a better understanding by the public of the importance of coastal resources, both to the quality of life for people and to the maintenance of a healthy and productive natural environment. The guide shall be sensitive to the need for a balanced approach to the conservation and use of coastal resources, to the rights and responsibilities of individuals and the public in the protection and use of these resources, and the need to limit human use of some resources in order to avoid their degradation or destruction. The guide shall not be a policy guide, but rather it shall be an educational tool to increase the public understanding and appreciation of the value of California’s coastal resources.

(c) The commission shall utilize innovative techniques for the preparation, production, and distribution of the guide so as to minimize costs to the public. To this end, the commission is encouraged to enlist the voluntary assistance of private and public organizations with appropriate expertise. In addition, the commission shall seek grants from private and public institutions to augment its limited funding.

Notwithstanding Section 14850 of the Government Code or any other provision of law, the commission may contract for the production of this guide with any public or private entity in order to meet the objective of this section.

(d) The guide shall be written and illustrated so as to be easily understood by the general public and shall be set forth in a format that ensures its usefulness.

(e) The guide shall be made available to the public at a reasonable cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1470, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Local Coastal Program Implementation Costs [30350. - 30355.]

30350.

(a) It is the policy of the state that local governments be paid their legitimate costs, from either state or federal funds, for the implementation of certified local coastal programs; provided, however, that such payment shall only be available for those costs directly attributable to the operation of a certified local coastal program and which costs would not have been incurred but for such local coastal program and which costs are not of a nature which would normally be incurred by such local government in carrying out its land use planning and regulatory responsibilities pursuant to any provision of law other than this division.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, claims for payment of costs directly attributable to the operation and implementation of a certified local coastal program shall only be submitted, reviewed, and approved in the manner set forth in, and pursuant to the provisions of, this article.

(c) The provisions of this article are intended to establish a procedure that ensures the orderly and carefully monitored expenditure of limited public funds for payment of such costs, the incurring of which is hereby recognized as being in the interest of all the people of this state because they carry out state policies for the wise, long-term conservation and use of coastal resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

30351.

The commission shall, not later than July 1, 1980, prepare and adopt procedures for the issuance and management of local coastal program implementation grants. The purpose of the grants program is to provide, to the extent funds are available, financial assistance for local governments and, in cases the commission deems appropriate, other public agencies to carry out certified local coastal programs. The procedures required by this section shall specify, consistent with the criteria set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 30350, the categories of expenditures eligible for implementation grants and shall include procedures for application, review, approval, and disbursement of grant funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

30352.

(a) Any local government carrying out its certified local coastal programs may, upon the delegation of the development review authority pursuant to Section 30519, claim reimbursement of costs incurred for the implementation of such local coastal program if costs have not been provided in an implementation grant issued pursuant to Section 30351.

(b) Claims made pursuant to this article shall be submitted to the executive director of the commission not later than September 30 immediately following the fiscal year during which the claimed costs were incurred. The executive director shall review such claims in accordance with the provisions of this article and shall submit all such claims to the Controller within 60 days after receipt of a claim, but in no event later than November 30.

(c) All claims submitted pursuant to this section shall be filed on forms approved and prepared by the commission in consultation with the Controller. Such forms shall specify the information needed to enable the executive director of the commission and the Controller to make the determinations required by Section 30353. The claim forms required by this section shall provide for claims of actual costs incurred during the fiscal year preceding submittal and for the costs the claimant local government estimates will be incurred during the then-current fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1308, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

30353.

Payment for costs claimed pursuant to this article shall be made only for costs which, but for the operation of a certified local coastal program, would not have been incurred by the claimant local government and if the following criteria are met:

(a) Costs for establishing a regulatory program to implement a certified local coastal program, including costs for the preparation and printing of public information materials, application forms, establishing new procedures, and staff training are payable. The costs specified in this subdivision include initial startup costs incurred over a period not to exceed one year from the date a certified local coastal program has been adopted for implementation by the appropriate local government.

(b) A fixed payment not to exceed ten dollars ($10) per permit application for any development subject to a certified local coastal program may be claimed and paid. The payment specified in this subdivision is intended to cover general costs, including costs for public notice, notice and submittal of files to the commission, and appearances before the commission.

(c) Other costs of processing and reviewing coastal development permits pursuant to a certified local coastal program shall normally not be eligible for reimbursement because these types of activities should either be incorporated within the routine regulatory process of the local government or, at the discretion of the local government, be paid for from reasonable permit fees. A local government may, however, request payment for increased regulatory costs if it can show that either or both of the following special circumstances apply within its jurisdiction:

(1) In jurisdictions with a population of less than 10,000, the existing regulatory program of the local government is not capable of processing and reviewing additional coastal development permits pursuant to a certified local coastal program and where the increased costs could not reasonably be expected to be covered by permit fees.

(2) The regulatory program included in a certified local coastal program requires the discharge of resource management functions that exceed the level of regulatory review normally required or undertaken by the local government.

(d) Costs for enforcement of regulatory requirements that are directly related to local coastal program implementation, such as ensuring compliance with coastal development permit terms and conditions, are payable, if the enforcement activities are not of a type routinely undertaken or of a type required by law as part of the affected local government’s normal regulatory responsibilities.

(e) Litigation costs which, but for the operation of a certified local coastal program, would not have been incurred may be paid. Where an action is brought against a local government and the action states as a principal cause of action the operation of the local government’s local coastal program and the local government prevails in the action, litigation costs may be paid to the extent the costs are not assessed against the party bringing the action. Where the local government loses the action primarily on grounds it has failed to properly carry out its certified local coastal program, litigation costs shall not be paid. In accordance with procedures established by the executive director of the commission in consultation with the Attorney General, litigation costs may be paid prior to the rendering of a final judgment in the action, if the Attorney General has intervened in the action in support of the local government’s position, the amount paid does not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), and the amount paid is equal to or greater than 5 percent of the local government’s general revenues as published in the most recent version of “Cities Annual Report” by the Controller. The local government shall reimburse the state from any costs recovered after a final judgment is rendered in the action.

(f) If additional planning is required by the commission as a condition of its certification of any local coastal program, costs for the additional planning are payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1104, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

30354.

(a) The executive director of the commission shall review and evaluate each claim submitted pursuant to this article and shall determine whether:

(1) The costs claimed meet the requirements of this article.

(2) The costs claimed are not paid for or reimbursed from any other source of state or federal funding.

(3) The claimed costs are reasonable for the implementation of a certified local coastal program.

(b) The executive director of the commission shall submit to the Controller, on behalf of each claimant local government, all
 claims submitted pursuant to this section together with
 the executive director’s recommendation whether the Controller should allow or deny, in whole or in part, the claim. A copy of each claim shall also be sent to the claimant local government at the time such claim is submitted to the Controller. The executive director’s recommendation shall be based on their determinations made pursuant to this article. If the executive director fails to make a recommendation by the time claims are required to be submitted to the Controller, as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 30352, the executive director shall be deemed to have recommended approval of the claim.

(c) The provisions of Section
 17561 of the Government Code shall apply to claims filed pursuant to this article, provided that where a conflict between Section 17561 of the Government Code and this article occurs, the conflict shall be resolved in a manner that best carries out the purposes of this article. The Controller shall apply the criteria of this article in
 determining whether to allow or deny, in whole or in part, a claim and shall consider the recommendations of the executive director of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 14.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30355.

As used in this article, “certified local coastal program” means any portion of a local coastal program that has been certified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. State Agencies [30400. - 30421.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [30400. - 30405.]

30400.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to minimize duplication and conflicts among existing state agencies carrying out their regulatory duties and responsibilities.

(b) In the absence of a specific authorization set forth in this division or any other provision of law
 or in an agreement entered into with the commission, no state agency, including the Office of Planning and Research, shall exercise any powers or carry out any duties or responsibilities established by this division or by the Federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C. 1451 et seq.) or any amendment thereto. The Director of the Office of Planning and Research shall, in carrying out
 the director’s
 duties as set forth in Section 30415, ensure that the provisions of this section are carried out.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 15.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30401.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this division, enactment of this division does not increase, decrease, duplicate or supersede the authority of any existing state agency.

This chapter shall not be construed to limit in any way the regulatory controls over development pursuant to Chapters 7 (commencing with Section 30600) and 8 (commencing with Section 30700), except that the commission shall not set standards or adopt regulations that duplicate regulatory controls established by any existing state agency pursuant to specific statutory requirements or authorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

30402.

All state agencies shall carry out their duties and responsibilities in conformity with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30403.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the policies of this division and all local coastal programs prepared pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 30500) should provide the common assumptions upon which state functional plans for the coastal zone are based in accordance with the provisions of Section 65036 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30404.

The Natural Resources Agency shall periodically, in the case of the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection, the State Water Resources Control Board and the California regional water quality control boards, the State Air Resources Board and air pollution control districts and air quality management districts, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the California
 Geological Survey and the Geologic Energy Management Division in the Department of Conservation, and the State Lands Commission, and may, with respect to any other state agency, submit recommendations designed to encourage the state agency to carry out its functions in a manner consistent with this division. The recommendations may include proposed changes in administrative regulations, rules, and statutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 16.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30405.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, no later than July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature that includes all of the following information for the preceding year:

(1) The number of residential development projects that were appealed to the commission.

(2) The number of appealed residential development projects for which the permit applicant waived the deadline for the commission to hear the appeal.

(3) The number of appealed residential development projects that were approved, approved with conditions, denied, or withdrawn.

(4) For each project described in paragraph (3), the commission shall include all of the following:

(A) A description of the project, including, but not limited to, the number of units in the project and the percentage of units affordable to very low, low-, and moderate-income households.

(B) The length of time from the appeal to the final action on each project.

(C) Any conditions imposed by the commission on a project, and the reason for approval, approval with conditions, or denial.

(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 22, Sec. 63.   (AB 130)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. State Agencies [30410. - 30421.]

30410.

(a) The commission and the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission shall conduct a joint review of this division and Title 7.2 (commencing with Section 66600) of the Government Code to determine how the program administered by the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission shall be related to this division. Both commissions shall jointly present their recommendations to the Legislature not later than July 1, 1978.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the ports under the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, including the Ports of San Francisco, Oakland, Richmond, Redwood City, Encinal Terminals, and Benicia, should be treated no less favorably than the ports under the jurisdiction of the commission covered in Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 30700) under the terms of any legislation which is developed pursuant to such study.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30411.

(a) The Department of Fish and Wildlife and the Fish and Game Commission are the principal state agencies responsible for the establishment and control of wildlife and fishery management programs and the commission shall not establish or impose any controls with respect thereto that duplicate or exceed regulatory controls established by these agencies pursuant to specific statutory requirements or authorization.

(b) The Department of Fish and Wildlife in consultation with the commission and the Division of Boating and Waterways within the Department of Parks and Recreation, may study degraded wetlands and identify those which can most feasibly be restored in conjunction with development of a boating facility as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 30233. Any study
 conducted under this subdivision shall include consideration of all of the following:

(1) Whether the wetland is so severely degraded and its natural processes so substantially impaired that it is not capable of recovering and maintaining a high level of biological productivity without major restoration activities.

(2) Whether a substantial portion of the degraded wetland, but in no event less than 75 percent, can be restored and maintained as a highly productive wetland in conjunction with a boating facilities project.

(3) Whether restoration of the wetland’s natural values, including its biological productivity and wildlife habitat features, can most feasibly be achieved and maintained in conjunction with a boating facility or whether there are other feasible ways to achieve these values.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that salt water or brackish water aquaculture is a coastal-dependent use which should be encouraged to augment food supplies and to further the policies set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 825) of Division 1. The Department of Fish and Wildlife may identify coastal sites it determines to be appropriate for aquaculture facilities. If the Department of Fish and Wildlife identifies these sites, it shall transmit information identifying the sites to the commission and the relevant local government agency. The commission and, where appropriate, local governments shall, consistent with the coastal planning requirements of this division, provide for as many coastal sites identified by the Department of Fish and Wildlife for any uses that are consistent with the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).

(d) Any agency of the
 state owning or managing land in the coastal zone for public purposes shall be an active participant in the selection of suitable sites for aquaculture facilities and shall make the land available for use in aquaculture when feasible and consistent with other policies of this division and other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 259.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

30412.

(a) In addition to Section 13142.5 of the Water Code, this section shall apply to the commission and the State Water Resources Control Board and the California regional water quality control boards. 
